North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article X Homesteads and Exemptions

§ 1. Personal property exemptions.

The personal property of any resident of this State, to a value fixed by the General Assembly but not less than $500, to be selected by the resident, is exempted from sale under execution or other final process of any court, issued for the collection of any debt.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to exempt property, see

G.S. 1C-1601

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. X, § 1, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the non-purchase security agreement as a relinquishment of the personal property exemption, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 708 (1979).

For note on enforcement of separation agreements by specific performance, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 117 (1980).

For article on North Carolina’s new Exemption Act, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 865 (1981).

For article analyzing North Carolina’s exemptions law, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1025 (1982).

For article, “Leandro’s Limit: Do North Carolina’s Homeschoolers Have a Right to a Sound Basic Education Protected by the State?,” see 36 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2014).

§ 2. Homestead exemptions.

Exemption from sale; exceptions.— Every homestead and the dwellings and buildings used therewith, to a value fixed by the General Assembly but not less than $1,000, to be selected by the owner thereof, or in lieu thereof, at the option of the owner, any lot in a city or town with the dwellings and buildings used thereon, and to the same value, owned and occupied by a resident of the State, shall be exempt from sale under execution or other final process obtained on any debt. But no property shall be exempt from sale for taxes, or for payment of obligations contracted for its purchase.

Exemption for benefit of children.— The homestead, after the death of the owner thereof, shall be exempt from the payment of any debt during the minority of the owner’s children, or any of them.

Exemption for benefit of surviving spouse.— If the owner of a homestead dies, leaving a surviving spouse but no minor children, the homestead shall be exempt from the debts of the owner, and the rents and profits thereof shall inure to the benefit of the surviving spouse until he or she remarries, unless the surviving spouse is the owner of a separate homestead.

Conveyance of homestead.— Nothing contained in this Article shall operate to prevent the owner of a homestead from disposing of it by deed, but no deed made by a married owner of a homestead shall be valid without the signature and acknowledgement of his or her spouse.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 1977, c. 80, ss. 1, 2.

Cross references.

As to exempt property, see

G.S. 1C-1601

et seq.

As to conveyances by husband and wife, see

G.S. 39-7

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are similar to those of Art. X, § 2, Const. 1868. The provisions of subsection (2) are similar to those of Art X, § 3, Const. 1868. The provisions of subsection (3) are similar to those of Art. X, § 5, Const. 1868. The provisions of subsection (4) are similar to those of Art. X, § 8, Const. 1868, as amended in 1944.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment as to whether North Carolina really has a homestead exemption, see 2 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 53 (1966).

For note on the non-purchase security agreement as a relinquishment of the personal property exemption, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 708 (1979).

For article on debtors’ exemption rights under the Bankruptcy Reform Act, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 769 (1980).

For note on enforcement of separation agreements by specific performance, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 117 (1980).

§ 3. Mechanics’ and laborers’ liens.

The General Assembly shall provide by proper legislation for giving to mechanics and laborers an adequate lien on the subject-matter of their labor. The provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this Article shall not be so construed as to prevent a laborer’s lien for work done and performed for the person claiming the exemption or a mechanic’s lien for work done on the premises.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to statutory liens and charges, see

G.S. 44A-1

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of the first sentence of this section are similar to those of Art. XIV, § 4, Const. 1868. The provisions of the second sentence of this section are similar to those of Art. X, § 4, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Construction Law Survey II,” see 22 Wake Forest L. Rev. 481 (1987).

§ 4. Property of married women secured to them.

The real and personal property of any female in this State acquired before marriage, and all property, real and personal, to which she may, after marriage, become in any manner entitled, shall be and remain the sole and separate estate and property of such female, and shall not be liable for any debts, obligations, or engagements of her husband, and may be devised and bequeathed and conveyed by her, subject to such regulations and limitations as the General Assembly may prescribe. Every married woman may exercise powers of attorney conferred upon her by her husband, including the power to execute and acknowledge deeds to property owned by herself and her husband or by her husband.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to conveyances by husband and wife, see

G.S. 39-7

et seq.

As to powers and liabilities of married persons, see

G.S. 52-1

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. X, § 6, Const. 1868, as amended in 1956 and 1964.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on wife’s conveyance of her realty by virtue of husband’s power of attorney, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 228 (1953).

For note on constitutionality of husband’s right to dissent from wife’s will, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 311 (1963).

For comment as to whether North Carolina really has a homestead exemption, see 2 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 53 (1966).

For comment on the constitutionality of the privy examination under G.S. 52-6(a) (now repealed) and its relation to this section, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1007 (1977).

For comment on tenancy by the entirety in North Carolina, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 997 (1980).

For article analyzing North Carolina’s tenancy by the entirety reform legislation of 1982, see 5 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (1982).

For comment on the tax effects of equitable distribution upon divorce, see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 555 (1982).

For comment discussing the status of the presumption of purchase money resulting trust for wives in light of Mims v. Mims,

305 N.C. 41

, 286 S.E.2d 779 (1982), see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 576 (1983).

For article, “A Spouse’s Right to Control Assets During Marriage: Is North Carolina Living in the Middle Ages?,” see 18 Campbell L. Rev. 203 (1996).

§ 5. Insurance.

A person may insure his or her own life for the sole use and benefit of his or her spouse or children or both, and upon his or her death the proceeds from the insurance shall be paid to or for the benefit of the spouse or children or both, or to a guardian, free from all claims of the representatives or creditors of the insured or his or her estate. Any insurance policy which insures the life of a person for the sole use and benefit of that person’s spouse or children or both shall not be subject to the claims of creditors of the insured during his or her lifetime, whether or not the policy reserves to the insured during his or her lifetime any or all rights provided for by the policy and whether or not the policy proceeds are payable to the estate of the insured in the event the beneficiary or beneficiaries predecease the insured.

History.

1977, c. 115, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. X, § 7, Const. 1868, as amended in 1932.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on debtors’ exemption rights under the Bankruptcy Reform Act, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 769 (1980).

For article on the rights of individuals to control the distributional consequences of divorce by private contract and on the interests of the State in preserving its role as a third party to marriage and divorce, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 819 (1981).